South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3551.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Earnable compensation SECTION 1.A.    Section 9-1-10(8) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (c) Earnable compensation does not include amounts paid to managers and clerks of elections to the extent the amounts are not subject to Federal Insurance Contribution Act tax pursuant to Internal Revenue Code Sections 3121(b)(7)(F)(iv) and 3121(u)(2)(B)(ii)(V). B.    This SECTION takes effect on June 30, 2026. Gross income SECTION 2.    Section 12-6-1120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (12) Amounts paid to managers and clerks of elections to the extent the amounts are not subject to Federal Insurance Contribution Act tax pursuant to Internal Revenue Code Sections 3121(b)(7)(F)(iv) and 3121(u)(2)(B)(ii)(V). Time effective SECTION 3.    Except as otherwise provided, this act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and applies to tax years beginning after 2025. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. __________